Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1556
Act; enforcement; personnel.

The director may designate trained employees of the department to enforce and administer the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act and all rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the act. The director may contract with other state and local governmental agencies having law enforcement capabilities for services and personnel reasonably necessary to carry out the enforcement provisions of the act. All peace officers of this state or any political subdivision of this state shall enforce the provisions of the act and all rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the act and are empowered to issue citations to any person violating any provision of the act in their presence.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 23;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 9.
October 30, 2020